Maine, session 132, LD1770.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5219-KK, sub-§2-D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. S,
§4, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
Page 1 - 132LR2184(01)

2-D. Credit in 2022 and after. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022,
a resident individual is allowed a credit against the taxes imposed under this Part equal to
the amount by which the benefit base for the resident individual exceeds 4% of the resident
individual's income. The amount of the credit may not exceed:
A. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022 and before January 1, 2025,
$1,000 for resident individuals under 65 years of age as of the last day of the taxable
year;
B. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022 and before January 1, 2024,
$1,500 for resident individuals 65 years of age and older as of the last day of the taxable
year;
C. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024 and before January 1, 2025,
$2,000 for resident individuals 65 years of age and older as of the last day of the taxable
year;
D. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, $2,000 for resident individuals
under 65 years of age as of the last day of the taxable year; and
E. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, $2,500 for resident individuals
65 years of age and older as of the last day of the taxable year.
In the case of married individuals filing a joint return, only one spouse is required to be 65
years of age or older to qualify for the credit limitation specified in paragraphs B, C and E.
Married individuals filing separate returns do not qualify for the credit under this section.
Sec. 2. Real Estate Property Tax Relief Task Force established. The Real
Estate Property Tax Relief Task Force, referred to in this section as "the task force," is
established.
1. Membership. Notwithstanding Joint Rule 353, the task force consists of 13 voting
members and at least 2 nonvoting members as follows.
A. The 13 voting members are appointed as follows:
(1) Two members of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate,
including at least one member of the party holding the 2nd largest number of seats
in the Legislature and at least one of whom has expertise or background in the area
of taxation;
(2) Two members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of
the House, including at least one member of the party holding the 2nd largest
number of seats in the Legislature and at least one of whom has expertise or
background in the area of taxation;
(3) Three members of the public, appointed by the President of the Senate, as
follows:
(a) One member who is a representative of economists or who is a tax expert;
(b) One member who is a representative of low-income residents of the State;
and
(c) One member who has legal experience with constitutional issues or
property tax issues;
Page 2 - 132LR2184(01)

(4) Three members of the public, appointed by the Speaker of the House, as
follows:
(a) One member who is involved in real estate, economic or housing
development with experience in long-term homeownership trends in the State;
(b) One member who represents the business sector and who has paid property
taxes over the last 10 years; and
(c) One member who has expertise in assessing property taxes; and
(5) Three members of the public, appointed by the Governor, as follows:
(a) One member who represents the interests of municipalities with fewer than
15,000 residents and who has expertise in municipal government, municipal
taxation, local government finance or property valuation;
(b) One member who represents the interests of municipalities with at least
15,000 residents and who has expertise in municipal government, municipal
taxation, local government finance or property valuation; and
(c) One member who represents the interests of older residents.
In making their appointments, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House
and the Governor, to the extent feasible, shall ensure the membership of the task force
reflects comprehensive geographic representation from the State.
B. The nonvoting members are as follows:
(1) The Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services or the
commissioner's designee;
(2) The Associate Commissioner for Tax Policy within the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of Revenue Services or the
associate commissioner's designee; and
(3) Any additional members invited to participate by the chairs of the task force
pursuant to subsection 2.
2. Chairs; nonvoting members; selection of contracted entity. The first-named
Senate member is the Senate chair and the first-named House of Representatives member
is the House chair of the task force. The chairs may invite, as nonvoting members of the
task force, individuals who have expertise in municipal government, municipal finance,
economic development, constitutional law, tax policy, housing policy or tax assessing. The
chairs may select the contracted entity described in subsection 5, paragraph A, prior to all
appointments being made. Prior to the first meeting of the task force, the chairs may select
the contracted entity of the task force.
3. Appointments; convening of task force. All appointments must be made no later
than 30 days following the effective date of this Act. The appointing authorities shall notify
the Executive Director of the Legislative Council once all appointments have been
completed. After appointment of all members, the chairs shall call and convene the first
meeting of the task force. If 30 days or more after the effective date of this resolve a
majority of but not all appointments have been made, the chairs may request authority and
the Legislative Council may grant authority for the task force to meet and conduct its
business.
4. Meetings. The task force shall meet at least 4 times but no more than 8 times.
Page 3 - 132LR2184(01)

5. Duties. The task force shall:
A. Contract with an entity for research and analytical support, as selected by the chairs
pursuant to subsection 2, with the goal of determining the source of the problems with
the current system of property taxation, who is most negatively affected by the current
system of property taxation and how those persons are negatively affected. At the
direction of the chairs, an entity contracted with pursuant to this paragraph shall gather
and analyze statewide property tax data, which may include:
(1) For each municipality or each municipality within a representative sample of
municipalities by county:
(a) The average property value, property tax bill and length of
homeownership, differentiated by waterfront and nonwaterfront properties;
(b) The types of property; mill rate; date of last valuation; property valuation
practices, including whether the municipality performs the valuations; median
income of residents; number of households eligible to claim and actually
claiming the property tax fairness credit pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 36, section 5219-KK; number of homesteads eligible to
participate in and actually participating in the deferred collection of homestead
property taxes pursuant to Title 36, chapter 908; which municipalities have
municipally funded and administered property tax relief programs; and the
percentage of homes that are primary residences, the percentage of commercial
property and the percentage of vacant commercial property; and
(c) How the municipality has used property tax relief funding, including but
not limited to funds received from state-municipal revenue sharing pursuant to
Title 30-A, section 5681;
(2) For each county:
(a) Changes in property values over the last 20 years; and
(b) The average percentage of income spent on property taxes by residents;
(3) Data regarding any disparities or challenges across different regions in the
State;
(4) Recent statewide property tax relief efforts that have been implemented or
discussed in the Legislature or State Government;
(5) Potential federal funding changes and how those could potentially impact
property taxes in the State;
(6) Any challenges in obtaining the information specified in this paragraph for the
task force and recommendations for making the information available to the
Legislature on a regular basis; and
(7) Any additional data or information the chairs consider relevant to a productive
discussion;
B. Perform a comparison of this State to the rest of the nation, including:
(1) Determining how property tax assessment is instituted, the expenses associated
with assessment and how assessment in the State compares with other states;
(2) Exploring property tax relief measures and programs used by other states,
particularly those states similar in geography, demographics, resident income or
Page 4 - 132LR2184(01)

414 state and local government structure, to determine whether those relief programs
425 could be adapted to the State;
(3) Studying property tax burdens in other states, including as a percentage of
resident income, and any trends over the last 20 years; and
(4) Gathering any additional data or information the chairs determine relevant to a
productive discussion;
C. Explore the need for amendments to the Constitution of Maine or to the Maine
Revised Statutes, including:
(1) Reviewing constitutional constraints on property tax assessments and exploring
whether an amendment to the Constitution of Maine could create more equitable
and stable property tax policies;
(2) Researching whether other states have constitutional provisions that allow for
equitable property tax structures;
(3) Researching which states have successfully amended their constitutions to
allow for more effective property tax relief and the advantages and disadvantages
of those amendments; and
(4) Recommending whether constitutional changes should be pursued and, if so,
what changes should be made and how and when those changes should be made;
D. Develop methods to ensure municipalities use property tax relief for its intended
purpose while continuing to meet the needs of residents by:
(1) Identifying mechanisms used in other states to ensure that local property tax
relief funds are allocated effectively to the taxpayers;
(2) Exploring mechanisms to support transparency and accountability in the use of
property tax relief funds at the municipal level that exist in other states or that have
been discussed in the State; and
(3) Recommending accountability measures, including but not limited to reporting
requirements, financial incentives or disincentives;
E. Assess changes to the valuation process and support for municipalities by:
(1) Investigating how other states ensure equitable, updated and fair valuation
practices;
(2) Analyzing whether certain geographic regions or types of communities, such
as service centers, in the State have disproportionate property assessments that
negatively affect specific populations;
(3) Identifying those resources municipalities need to conduct accurate property
valuations, including funding, staffing and technology; and
(4) Recommending best practices and potential legislative changes to improve
fairness and accuracy in property assessments;
F. Develop targeted support for long-term property owners who need support to age
in place by:
(1) Studying states that have implemented property tax relief programs specifically
for long-term homeowners; and
(2) Recommending which tax policies the State should adopt to prevent
displacement and maintain affordability of elderly and low-income homeowners;
Page 5 - 132LR2184(01)

G. Explore the use of the State's cash pool for property tax relief by:
(1) Researching how other states use state investment funds to support property tax
relief programs;
(2) Analyzing potential risks and benefits of using the State's cash reserves to
provide long-term property tax relief; and
(3) Recommending whether a dedicated revenue stream should be created for this
purpose and how it could be structured; and
H. Examine potential impacts of federal funding changes on property taxes in the State.
The task force shall engage in a data-driven analysis of the State's property tax system
before making recommendations pursuant to this subsection.
6. Assistance in collection of data. The Department of Administrative and Financial
Services, Bureau of Revenue Services and the Office of Tax Policy within the bureau shall
provide assistance to the entity contracted with by the task force pursuant to subsection 5,
paragraph A to ensure the entity obtains the required information.
7. Public input. The task force may, as determined necessary by the chairs, solicit
and consider public comment on the current property tax structure, current property tax
relief efforts and the valuation and assessment process.
8. Staff assistance. The Legislative Council shall provide necessary staffing services
or may contract for necessary staffing services for the task force, except that Legislative
Council staff support is not authorized when the Legislature is in regular or special session.
Upon request of the task force, the Office of the Attorney General, the office of the
Secretary of State, the Office of Policy Innovation and the Future, the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of Revenue Services, the Department of
Economic and Community Development and office of the Treasurer of State shall provide
additional information to the task force.
9. Report. That, notwithstanding Joint Rule 353, no later than December 15, 2025,
the task force shall submit a report that includes its findings and recommendations,
including suggested legislation, to the Joint Standing Committee on Taxation. The joint
standing committee may report out a bill to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd
Legislature based on the report.
10. Additional funding sources. Notwithstanding Joint Rule 353, the task force may
apply for and receive funds, grants or contributions from public and private sources to
support its activities.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.